New York, session 2025-2026, A3808.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 3-401 of the election law, as 2 added by chapter 90 of the laws of 1991, is amended to read as follows: 3 4. Any county board of elections appointing election coordinators and 4 in the city of New York, the board of elections of the city of New York, 5 shall prepare a report detailing assignments and duties to be delegated 6 to election coordinators. Any county board of elections appointing 7 election coordinators and in the city of New York, the board of 8 elections of the city of New York, shall prepare a report detailing 9 assignments of election inspectors and poll clerks, and shall specif- 10 ically enumerate the poll sites for which election inspectors or poll 11 clerks have not yet been assigned, detailing the efforts made to date to 12 fill those assignments. Said [report] reports shall be filed with the 13 state board of elections no later than one month prior to the election 14 at which election coordinators, election inspectors and poll clerks are 15 to be assigned. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06593-01-5